Washington statutes.
RCW 9.61.200

Carrier or racing pigeons—Removal or alteration of identification.

It is a class 2 civil infraction for any person other than the owner thereof or his or her authorized agent to remove or alter any stamp, leg band, ring, or other mark of identification attached to any Antwerp Messenger or Racing Pigeon.

[ 2011 c 336 s 315; 1987 c 456 s 26; 1963 c 69 s 2.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1987 c 456: See RCW 7.80.005.

Effective date—1987 c 456 ss 9-31: See RCW 7.80.901.